Tennessee, session 114, SB1022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-116, is amended by deleting
subdivision (d)(2) and substituting:
(2) "Law enforcement officer" includes, but is not limited to, a POST-certified law
enforcement officer; capitol police officer; Tennessee highway patrol officer; Tennessee
bureau of investigation agent; Tennessee wildlife resources agency officer; deputy jailer;
correctional officer employed by a county jail, the department of correction, or a private
prison contractor; probation or parole officer employed by the department of correction
or a private probation provider; or park ranger employed by the division of parks and
recreation in the department of environment and conservation; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1022
000403
- 1 -